Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1941
Differences in rights and obligations.

All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption, and transfer, unless the articles or bylaws establish classes of membership with different rights or obligations. All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to any other matters, except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 41.